Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2739.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 10, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1309, to read: START_STATUTE33-1309. Senior rent increase limitation A landlord may not increase rent more than three percent annually for a tenant who is sixty-five years of age or older.END_STATUTE